test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_piivtas_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - piivtâs: # ok
    piivtâs+N+Sg+Nom: piivtâs
    piivtâs+N+Sg+Gen: pihtâs
    piivtâs+N+Sg+Acc: pihtâs
    piivtâs+N+Sg+Ill: pihtâsân
    piivtâs+N+Sg+Loc: pihtâsist
    piivtâs+N+Sg+Com: pihtâsáin
    piivtâs+N+Sg+Abe: pihtâsttáá
    piivtâs+N+Ess: piˊvtâsin
    piivtâs+N+Par: piˊvtâsid
    piivtâs+N+Pl+Nom: pihtâseh
    piivtâs+N+Pl+Gen: pihtâsij
    piivtâs+N+Pl+Acc: pihtâsijd
    piivtâs+N+Pl+Ill: pihtâsáid
    piivtâs+N+Pl+Loc: pihtâsijn
    piivtâs+N+Pl+Com: pihtâsijguin
    piivtâs+N+Pl+Abe: pihtâsijttáá

  Noun - kiirâs: # 
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Nom: kiirâs
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Gen: kirrâs
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Acc: kirrâs
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Ill: kirrâsân
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Loc: kirrâsist
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Com: kirrâsáin
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Abe: kirrâsttáá
    kiirâs+N+Ess: kiˊṛâsin
    kiirâs+N+Par: kiˊṛâsid
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Nom: kirrâseh
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Gen: kirrâsij
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Acc: kirrâsijd
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Ill: kirrâsáid
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Loc: kirrâsijn
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Com: kirrâsijguin
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Abe: kirrâsijttáá

  Noun - raagâs:
    raagâs+N+Sg+Nom: raagâs
    raagâs+N+Sg+Gen: raggâs
    raagâs+N+Sg+Acc: raggâs
    raagâs+N+Sg+Ill: raggâsân
    raagâs+N+Sg+Loc: raggâsist
    raagâs+N+Sg+Com: raggâsáin
    raagâs+N+Sg+Abe: raggâsttáá
    raagâs+N+Ess: raˊgâsin
    raagâs+N+Par: raˊgâsid
    raagâs+N+Pl+Nom: raggâseh
    raagâs+N+Pl+Gen: raggâsij
    raagâs+N+Pl+Acc: raggâsijd
    raagâs+N+Pl+Ill: raggâsáid
    raagâs+N+Pl+Loc: raggâsijn
    raagâs+N+Pl+Com: raggâsijguin
    raagâs+N+Pl+Abe: raggâsijttáá

  Noun - laaiđâs:
    laaiđâs+N+Sg+Nom: laaiđâs
    laaiđâs+N+Sg+Gen: laiđâs
    laaiđâs+N+Sg+Acc: laiđâs
    laaiđâs+N+Sg+Ill: laiđâsân
    laaiđâs+N+Sg+Loc: laiđâsist
    laaiđâs+N+Sg+Com: laiđâsáin
    laaiđâs+N+Sg+Abe: laiđâsttáá
    laaiđâs+N+Ess: laˊiđâsin
    laaiđâs+N+Par: laˊiđâsid
    laaiđâs+N+Pl+Nom: laiđâseh
    laaiđâs+N+Pl+Gen: laiđâsij
    laaiđâs+N+Pl+Acc: laiđâsijd
    laaiđâs+N+Pl+Ill: laiđâsáid
    laaiđâs+N+Pl+Loc: laiđâsijn
    laaiđâs+N+Pl+Com: laiđâsijguin
    laaiđâs+N+Pl+Abe: laiđâsijttáá

  Noun - skoođâs: # ok
    skoođâs+N+Sg+Nom: skoođâs
    skoođâs+N+Sg+Gen: skođđâs
    skoođâs+N+Sg+Acc: skođđâs
    skoođâs+N+Sg+Ill: skođđâsân
    skoođâs+N+Sg+Loc: skođđâsist
    skoođâs+N+Sg+Com: skođđâsáin
    skoođâs+N+Sg+Abe: skođđâsttáá
    skoođâs+N+Ess: skoˊđ̣âsin
    skoođâs+N+Par: skoˊđ̣âsid
    skoođâs+N+Pl+Nom: skođđâseh
    skoođâs+N+Pl+Gen: skođđâsij
    skoođâs+N+Pl+Acc: skođđâsijd
    skoođâs+N+Pl+Ill: skođđâsáid
    skoođâs+N+Pl+Loc: skođđâsijn
    skoođâs+N+Pl+Com: skođđâsijguin
    skoođâs+N+Pl+Abe: skođđâsijttáá

  Noun - vaajâs:
    vaajâs+N+Sg+Nom: vaajâs
    vaajâs+N+Sg+Gen: vaijâs
    vaajâs+N+Sg+Acc: vaijâs
    vaajâs+N+Sg+Ill: vaj̣âsân
    vaajâs+N+Sg+Loc: vaj̣âsist
    vaajâs+N+Sg+Com: vaj̣âsáin
    vaajâs+N+Sg+Abe: vaijâsttáá
    vaajâs+N+Ess: vaˊj̣âsin
    vaajâs+N+Par: vaˊj̣âsid
    vaajâs+N+Pl+Nom: vaijâseh
    vaajâs+N+Pl+Gen: vaijâsij
    vaajâs+N+Pl+Acc: vaijâsijd
    vaajâs+N+Pl+Ill: vaijâsáid
    vaajâs+N+Pl+Loc: vaijâsijn
    vaajâs+N+Pl+Com: vaijâsijguin
    vaajâs+N+Pl+Abe: vaijâsijttáá

  Noun - mielgâs+v2:
    mielgâs+v2+N+Sg+Nom: mielgâs
    mielgâs+v2+N+Sg+Gen: mielˊgâs
    mielgâs+v2+N+Sg+Acc: mielˊgâs
    mielgâs+v2+N+Sg+Ill: mieˊlgâsân
    mielgâs+v2+N+Sg+Loc: mieˊlgâsist
    mielgâs+v2+N+Sg+Com: mieˊlgâsáin
    mielgâs+v2+N+Sg+Abe: mielgâsttáá
    mielgâs+v2+N+Ess: mieˊlgâsin
    mielgâs+v2+N+Par: mieˊlgâsid
    mielgâs+v2+N+Pl+Nom: mieˊlgâseh
    mielgâs+v2+N+Pl+Gen: mieˊlgâsij
    mielgâs+v2+N+Pl+Acc: mieˊlgâsijd
    mielgâs+v2+N+Pl+Ill: mieˊlgâsáid
    mielgâs+v2+N+Pl+Loc: mieˊlgâsijn
    mielgâs+v2+N+Pl+Com: mieˊlgâsijguin
    mielgâs+v2+N+Pl+Abe: mieˊlgâsijttáá

  Noun - mielgâs+v1:
    mielgâs+v1+N+Sg+Nom: mielgâs
    mielgâs+v1+N+Sg+Gen: mielˊgâs
    mielgâs+v1+N+Sg+Acc: mielˊgâs
    mielgâs+v1+N+Sg+Ill: mielˊgâsân
    mielgâs+v1+N+Sg+Loc: mielˊgâsist
    mielgâs+v1+N+Sg+Com: mielˊgâsáin
    mielgâs+v1+N+Sg+Abe: mielgâsttáá
    mielgâs+v1+N+Ess: mieˊlgâsin
    mielgâs+v1+N+Par: mieˊlgâsid
    mielgâs+v1+N+Pl+Nom: mielˊgâseh
    mielgâs+v1+N+Pl+Gen: mielˊgâsij
    mielgâs+v1+N+Pl+Acc: mielˊgâsijd
    mielgâs+v1+N+Pl+Ill: mielˊgâsáid
    mielgâs+v1+N+Pl+Loc: mielˊgâsijn
    mielgâs+v1+N+Pl+Com: mielˊgâsijguin
    mielgâs+v1+N+Pl+Abe: mielˊgâsijttáá


  Noun - ruonâs+v2:
    ruonâs+v2+N+Sg+Nom: ruonâs
    ruonâs+v2+N+Sg+Gen: ruonˊnâs
    ruonâs+v2+N+Sg+Acc: ruonˊnâs
    ruonâs+v2+N+Sg+Ill: ruoˊṇâsân
    ruonâs+v2+N+Sg+Loc: ruoˊṇâsist
    ruonâs+v2+N+Sg+Com: ruoˊṇâsáin
    ruonâs+v2+N+Sg+Abe: ruonˊnâsttáá
    ruonâs+v2+N+Ess: ruoˊṇâsin
    ruonâs+v2+N+Par: ruoˊṇâsid
    ruonâs+v2+N+Pl+Nom: ruoˊṇâseh
    ruonâs+v2+N+Pl+Gen: ruoˊṇâsij
    ruonâs+v2+N+Pl+Acc: ruoˊṇâsijd
    ruonâs+v2+N+Pl+Ill: ruoˊṇâsáid
    ruonâs+v2+N+Pl+Loc: ruoˊṇâsijn
    ruonâs+v2+N+Pl+Com: ruoˊṇâsijguin
    ruonâs+v2+N+Pl+Abe: ruoˊṇâsijttáá

  Noun - ruonâs+v1:
    ruonâs+v1+N+Sg+Nom: ruonâs
    ruonâs+v1+N+Sg+Gen: ruonˊnâs
    ruonâs+v1+N+Sg+Acc: ruonˊnâs
    ruonâs+v1+N+Sg+Ill: ruonˊnâsân
    ruonâs+v1+N+Sg+Loc: ruonˊnâsist
    ruonâs+v1+N+Sg+Com: ruonˊnâsáin
    ruonâs+v1+N+Sg+Abe: ruonˊnâsttáá
    ruonâs+v1+N+Ess: ruoˊṇâsin
    ruonâs+v1+N+Par: ruoˊṇâsid
    ruonâs+v1+N+Pl+Nom: ruonˊnâseh
    ruonâs+v1+N+Pl+Gen: ruonˊnâsij
    ruonâs+v1+N+Pl+Acc: ruonˊnâsijd
    ruonâs+v1+N+Pl+Ill: ruonˊnâsáid
    ruonâs+v1+N+Pl+Loc: ruonˊnâsijn
    ruonâs+v1+N+Pl+Com: ruonˊnâsijguin
    ruonâs+v1+N+Pl+Abe: ruonˊnâsijttáá

  Noun - suormâs+v2:
    suormâs+v2+N+Sg+Nom: suormâs
    suormâs+v2+N+Sg+Gen: suorˊmâs
    suormâs+v2+N+Sg+Acc: suorˊmâs
    suormâs+v2+N+Sg+Ill: suoˊrmâsân
    suormâs+v2+N+Sg+Loc: suoˊrmâsist
    suormâs+v2+N+Sg+Com: suoˊrmâsáin
    suormâs+v2+N+Sg+Abe: suorˊmâsttáá
    suormâs+v2+N+Ess: suoˊrmâsin
    suormâs+v2+N+Par: suoˊrmâsid
    suormâs+v2+N+Pl+Nom: suoˊrmâseh
    suormâs+v2+N+Pl+Gen: suoˊrmâsij
    suormâs+v2+N+Pl+Acc: suoˊrmâsijd
    suormâs+v2+N+Pl+Ill: suoˊrmâsáid
    suormâs+v2+N+Pl+Loc: suoˊrmâsijn
    suormâs+v2+N+Pl+Com: suoˊrmâsijguin
    suormâs+v2+N+Pl+Abe: suoˊrmâsijttáá

  Noun - suormâs+v1:
    suormâs+v1+N+Sg+Nom: suormâs
    suormâs+v1+N+Sg+Gen: suorˊmâs
    suormâs+v1+N+Sg+Acc: suorˊmâs
    suormâs+v1+N+Sg+Ill: suorˊmâsân
    suormâs+v1+N+Sg+Loc: suorˊmâsist
    suormâs+v1+N+Sg+Com: suorˊmâsáin
    suormâs+v1+N+Sg+Abe: suorˊmâsttáá
    suormâs+v1+N+Ess: suoˊrmâsin
    suormâs+v1+N+Par: suoˊrmâsid
    suormâs+v1+N+Pl+Nom: suorˊmâseh
    suormâs+v1+N+Pl+Gen: suorˊmâsij
    suormâs+v1+N+Pl+Acc: suorˊmâsijd
    suormâs+v1+N+Pl+Ill: suorˊmâsáid
    suormâs+v1+N+Pl+Loc: suorˊmâsijn
    suormâs+v1+N+Pl+Com: suorˊmâsijguin
    suormâs+v1+N+Pl+Abe: suorˊmâsijttáá

  Noun - siärvus+v2:
    siärvus+v2+N+Sg+Nom: siärvus
    siärvus+v2+N+Sg+Gen: siärˊvus
    siärvus+v2+N+Sg+Acc: siärˊvus
    siärvus+v2+N+Sg+Ill: siäˊrvusân
    siärvus+v2+N+Sg+Loc: siäˊrvusist
    siärvus+v2+N+Sg+Com: siäˊrvusáin
    siärvus+v2+N+Sg+Abe: siärˊvusttáá
    siärvus+v2+N+Ess: siäˊrvusin
    siärvus+v2+N+Par: siäˊrvusid
    siärvus+v2+N+Pl+Nom: siäˊrvuseh
    siärvus+v2+N+Pl+Gen: siäˊrvusij
    siärvus+v2+N+Pl+Acc: siäˊrvusijd
    siärvus+v2+N+Pl+Ill: siäˊrvusáid
    siärvus+v2+N+Pl+Loc: siäˊrvusijn
    siärvus+v2+N+Pl+Com: siäˊrvusijguin
    siärvus+v2+N+Pl+Abe: siäˊrvusijttáá

  Noun - siärvus+v1:
    siärvus+v1+N+Sg+Nom: siärvus
    siärvus+v1+N+Sg+Gen: siärˊvus
    siärvus+v1+N+Sg+Acc: siärˊvus
    siärvus+v1+N+Sg+Ill: siärˊvusân
    siärvus+v1+N+Sg+Loc: siärˊvusist
    siärvus+v1+N+Sg+Com: siärˊvusáin
    siärvus+v1+N+Sg+Abe: siärˊvusttáá
    siärvus+v1+N+Ess: siäˊrvusin
    siärvus+v1+N+Par: siäˊrvusid
    siärvus+v1+N+Pl+Nom: siärˊvuseh
    siärvus+v1+N+Pl+Gen: siärˊvusij
    siärvus+v1+N+Pl+Acc: siärˊvusijd
    siärvus+v1+N+Pl+Ill: siärˊvusáid
    siärvus+v1+N+Pl+Loc: siärˊvusijn
    siärvus+v1+N+Pl+Com: siärˊvusijguin
    siärvus+v1+N+Pl+Abe: siärˊvusijttáá

  Noun - čiepâs: # ok, MLO
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Nom: čiepâs
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Gen: čiepˊpâs
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Acc: čiepˊpâs
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Ill: čiepˊpâsân
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Loc: čiepˊpâsist
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Com: čiepˊpâsáin
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Abe: čiepˊpâsttáá
    čiepâs+N+Ess: [čieˊpâsin, čiepˊpâsin]
    čiepâs+N+Par: [čieˊpâsid, čiepˊpâsid]
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Nom: čiepˊpâseh
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Gen: čiepˊpâsij
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Acc: čiepˊpâsijd
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Ill: čiepˊpâsáid
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Loc: čiepˊpâsijn
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Com: čiepˊpâsijguin
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Abe: čiepˊpâsijttáá

  Noun - njuođâs: # ok, MLO
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Nom: njuođâs
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Gen: njuottâs
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Acc: njuottâs
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Ill: njuotˊtâsân
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Loc: njuotˊtâsist
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Com: njuotˊtâsáin
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Abe: njuottâsttáá
    njuođâs+N+Ess: njuoˊđâsin
    njuođâs+N+Par: njuoˊđâsid
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Nom: njuotˊtâseh
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Gen: njuotˊtâsij
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Acc: njuot'tâsijd
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Ill: njuot'tâsáid
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Loc: njuot'tâsijn
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Com: njuot'tâsijguin
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Abe: njuot'tâsijttáá

  Noun - kuálus: # ok, MLO 
    kuálus+N+Sg+Nom: kuáḷus
    kuálus+N+Sg+Gen: kuálˊlus
    kuálus+N+Sg+Acc: kuálˊlus
    kuálus+N+Sg+Ill: kuálˊlusân
    kuálus+N+Sg+Loc: kuálˊlusist
    kuálus+N+Sg+Com: kuálˊlusáin
    kuálus+N+Sg+Abe: kuálˊlusttáá
    kuálus+N+Ess:    kuáˊḷusin
    kuálus+N+Par:    kuáˊḷusid
    kuálus+N+Pl+Nom: kuálˊluseh
    kuálus+N+Pl+Gen: kuálˊlusij
    kuálus+N+Pl+Acc: kuálˊlusijd
    kuálus+N+Pl+Ill: kuálˊlusáid
    kuálus+N+Pl+Loc: kuálˊlusijn
    kuálus+N+Pl+Com: kuálˊlusijguin
    kuálus+N+Pl+Abe: kuálˊlusijttáá
